New York, session 2025-2026, A8627.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (e) of section 5031 of the civil practice law 2 and rules, as added by chapter 86 of the laws of 2003, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 (e) The discount rate to be used in determining the present value of 5 all streams of payments for periods of up to twenty years shall be the 6 rate in effect for the ten-year United States Treasury Bond on the date 7 of the verdict. As to any streams of payments for which the period of 8 years exceeds twenty years, the discount rate to be used in determining 9 the present value shall be calculated by averaging, on an annual basis, 10 the rate in effect for the ten-year United States Treasury Bond on the 11 date of the verdict for the first twenty years and [two percentage 12 points above] the rate in effect for the [ten-year] thirty-year United 13 States Treasury Bond on the date of the verdict for the years after 14 twenty years. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to any 16 verdicts entered on or after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13057-02-5